Massachusetts, session 194th, S1306.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The definition of “Employee” in section 1 of chapter 150E of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence
the following sentence:-
No person employed by the commonwealth in the Management Classification Series
below the level of M-VI shall be excluded from the coverage of this chapter unless either the
department of labor relations has determined that the actual duties of the particular position or
positions meet the test of a managerial employee established in this definition or an agreement
exists with the exclusive representative of the bargaining unit that covers similar types of work.
of 1